Alabama, session 2026rs, HB223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Beginning with the first pay day on or after
October 1, 2026, all state employees who are listed in the
classified and unclassified service of the state as defined in
Section 36-26-10, Code of Alabama 1975, and all other state
employees and hourly employees of the state, and all judicial
personnel, officers, and employees, and all legislative
personnel, officers, and employees, whether subject to the
State Merit System or not, and all employees of the county
health departments who are employed subject to the State Merit
System and whose compensation is paid out of a budget provided
and agreed upon by the state, county, or other contributing
agency under the direction of the State Board of Health shall
receive a salary increase of two percent.
Page 1

receive a salary increase of two percent.
HB223 INTRODUCED
Section 2. (a) Any cost-of-living increase granted
under this act shall in no way apply to any local supplement
provided to any judges or to any other local employee whose
salary is tied to that of any state employee.
(b) This act shall not apply to any Merit System
employee or hourly employee whose service or rate of pay is
covered by any labor agreement or contract.
Section 3. The Director of the State Personnel
Department shall revise the schedule of rates set forth in the
pay plan for state employees and shall send the same to the
State Comptroller, who shall issue warrants in accordance
therewith. With respect to all court officials and employees
within the Unified Judicial System who serve the trial and
appellate courts of the state and the Administrative Office of
Courts, the Administrative Director of Courts shall revise the
schedule of rates set forth in the pay plan for these court
officials and employees to reflect the increase provided in
this act, and shall certify the same to the State Comptroller,
who shall issue warrants in accordance therewith. With respect
to employees of the Legislature, the Secretary of the Senate
for employees of the Senate, the Clerk of the House of
Representatives for employees of the House and the Director of
the Legislative Services Agency for employees of the
Legislative Services Agency shall revise the schedule of rates
set forth in the pay plan for their employees to reflect the
increase provided in this act and shall certify the same to
the State Comptroller, who shall issue warrants in accordance
therewith.
Page 2

therewith.
HB223 INTRODUCED
Section 4. It is not the intent of this act to make
appropriations, but the appropriations required by this act
shall be made in the annual budget act for the affected
entities.
Section 5. This act shall become effective immediately
upon its passage and approval by the Governor, or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Page 3